Utah statutes.
23-19-11.1.   Hunter education practical shooting test -- Exemptions.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), the Wildlife Board may require that the division-approved hunter education course required by Subsection 23-19-11(1) include a practical shooting test.

(2)  A member of the United States Armed Forces, including the Utah National Guard, is exempt from a practical shooting test that may be required under Subsection (1) if the member has passed firearms training in the United States Armed Forces or Utah National Guard.

(3)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the Wildlife Board may make rules establishing firearms test verification requirements.

